Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1510
Highway superintendent; office; plat records of public roads.

The county highway superintendent shall be provided by the county with a suitable office which may be in the office or room occupied by the county board or elsewhere, as the board may choose, and he shall keep in his office plat records showing accurately all public roads and highways established in the county.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. II, § 10, p. 517.